Utah statutes.
49-11-620.   Closing the retirement account -- Status of retirees and
beneficiaries.
(1)  The monthly benefit payable for the month a retiree, beneficiary, or
alternate payee dies shall be a full monthly benefit and shall be payable to
the estate of the deceased.
(2)  If more than one year has elapsed since the death of a retiree whose
designated beneficiary is deceased and whose account payable to the
beneficiary amounts to $100 or less, the account shall be closed and further
payment may not be made.
